Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB370.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1504(a) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 1504. Dates and Times of School Terms and Sessions; Commencement.--(a) (1) The board of school directors of each school district shall fix the date of the beginning of the school term[.], except that, in a school district that is not on a year-round education calendar, the beginning of a school term for students shall not commence any earlier than the day after Labor Day. The board of school directors may, upon approval by the Secretary of Education, begin the school term prior to the 1234567891011121314151617181920 day after Labor Day for situations beyond the control of the school district as a result of major construction and renovation to the school building or natural disaster.(2) Unless otherwise determined by the board, the daily session of school shall open at nine ante-meridian and close at four post-meridian, with an intermission of one hour at noon, and an intermission of fifteen minutes in the forenoon and in the afternoon. Upon request of a board of school directors for an exception to the aforesaid daily schedule, the Secretary of Education may, when in his opinion a meritorious educational program warrants, approve a school week containing a minimum of twenty seven and one-half hours of instruction as the equivalent of five (5) school days, or a school year containing a minimum of nine hundred ninety hours of instruction at the secondary level or nine hundred (900) hours of instruction at the elementary level as the equivalent of one hundred eighty (180) school days.(3) Professional and temporary professional employes shall be allowed a lunch period free of supervisory or other duties of at least thirty minutes.(4) The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed:(i) to repeal any rule or regulation of any board of school directors now in effect which provides for a lunch period longer than the minimum prescribed herein or to repeal any action of any board of school directors taken in compliance with section 7 of the act of July 25, 1913 (P.L.1024, No.466), entitled "An act to protect the public health and welfare, by regulating the employment of females in certain establishments, with respect to their hours of labor and the conditions of their employment; by 20250HB0370PN0326 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 establishing certain sanitary regulations in the establishments in which they work; by requiring certain abstracts and notices to be posted; by providing for the enforcement of this act by the Commissioner of Labor and Industry and others; by prescribing penalties for violations thereof; by defining the procedure in prosecutions; and by repealing all acts and parts of acts inconsistent with the provisions thereof," as amended[.]; or(ii) to prevent a school district from conducting in-service sessions for teachers before Labor Day.* * *Section 2. Any contractually agreed-upon school calendar or process that determines the school calendar in effect on the effective date of this section between a school district and its professional or nonprofessional employees and that is in conflict with the provisions of this act shall remain in effect for the duration of that contract.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0370PN0326 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718